Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.285

Organization—First council may revise budget.

If, at the beginning of the term of office of the first council elected in a city organized under the council-manager plan, the appropriations for the expenditures of the city for the current fiscal year have been made, the council, by ordinance, may revise them but may not exceed the total appropriations for expenditures already specified in the budget for the year.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.18.285. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 24.]